Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 9.2 Rhode Island Restoration of Voting Rights Act

17-9.2-1.
Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Rhode Island Restoration of Voting Rights Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 476, § 1.

17-9.2-2.
Findings and purpose.

Findings. The legislature finds that:

Voting is both a fundamental right and a civic duty. Restoring the right to vote strengthens our democracy by increasing voter participation and helps people who have completed their incarceration to reintegrate into society. Voting is an essential part of reassuming the duties of full citizenship.

Rhode Island is the only state in New England that denies the vote to people convicted of felonies, not only while they are in prison, but also while they are living in the community under the supervision of parole or probation officials.

As a result of this extended disfranchisement, Rhode Island deprives a greater proportion of its residents of voting rights than any other state in the region. More than fifteen thousand five hundred (15,500) Rhode Islanders have lost the right to vote because of a felony conviction. Of these, eighty-six percent (86%) are not in prison, they have either been released or their convictions did not result in actual incarceration. Rhode Island has the second highest rate of people on probation in the nation.

Criminal disfranchisement in Rhode Island has a disproportionate impact on minority communities. The rate of disfranchisement of African American voters is more than six (6) times the statewide rate. Hispanics lose the vote at more than 2.5 times the statewide average. One in five (5) black men and one in eleven (11) Hispanic men are barred from voting in Rhode Island. By denying so many the right to vote, criminal disfranchisement laws dilute the political power of entire minority communities. Because these communities are concentrated in cities, the urban vote is also suppressed, with the rate of disfranchisement in urban areas 3.5 times the rate in the rest of the state.

Extending disfranchisement beyond a person’s term of incarceration complicates the process of restoring the right to vote. Under current law, a person may regain that right when released from incarceration if no parole follows, when discharged from parole, or when probation is completed. This system requires the involvement of many government agencies in the restoration process. This bill would simplify restoration by making people eligible to vote once they have served their time in prison, thereby concentrating in the department of corrections the responsibility for initiating restoration of voting rights. A streamlined restoration process conserves government resources and saves taxpayer dollars.

Purpose. The purposes of this act are to strengthen democratic institutions by increasing participation in the voting process, to help people who have completed prison sentences to become productive members of society, and to streamline procedures for restoring their right to vote.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 476, § 1.

17-9.2-3.
Restoration of voting rights.

A person who has lost the right of suffrage under Article II, Section 1 of the Constitution of Rhode Island because of such person’s incarceration upon a felony conviction shall be restored the right to vote when that person is discharged from incarceration.

Before accepting a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony, and before imposing a felony sentence after trial, the court shall notify the defendant that conviction will result in loss of the right to vote only if and for as long as the person is incarcerated and that voting rights are restored upon discharge.

The department of corrections shall act as a voter registration agency in accordance with §

17-9.1-8

. In this capacity, and as part of the release process leading to a person’s discharge from a correctional facility, the department of corrections shall notify that person in writing that voting rights will be restored, provide that person with a voter registration form and a declination form, and offer that person assistance in filling out the appropriate form. Unless the registrant refuses to permit it to do so, the department of corrections shall transmit the completed voter registration form to the state board or local board where the registrant resides.

The department of corrections shall, on or before the 15th day of each month, transmit to the secretary of state two (2) lists. The first shall contain the following information about persons convicted of a felony who, during the preceding period, have become ineligible to vote because of their incarceration; the second shall contain the following information about persons convicted of a felony who, during the preceding period, have become eligible to vote because of their discharge from incarceration:

name;

date of birth;

date of entry of judgment of conviction;

description of offense;

sentence.

The secretary of state shall ensure that the statewide central voter registration is purged of the names of persons who are ineligible to vote because of their incarceration upon a felony conviction. The secretary of state shall likewise ensure that the names of persons who are eligible and registered to vote following their discharge from incarceration are added to the statewide central voter register in the same manner as all other names are added to that register.

The secretary of state shall ensure that persons who have become eligible to vote because of their discharge from incarceration face no continued barriers to registration or voting resulting from their felony convictions.

The secretary of state shall develop and implement a program to educate attorneys, judges, election officials, corrections officials, and members of the public about the requirements of this section, ensuring that:

Judges are informed of their obligation to notify criminal defendants of the potential loss and restoration of their voting rights in accordance with subsection (b) hereof.

The department of corrections is prepared to assist people with registration to vote in anticipation of their discharge from incarceration, including by forwarding completed voter registration forms to the state board or local board where the registrant resides.

The language on voter registration forms makes clear that people who have been disqualified from voting because of felony convictions regain the right to vote when they are discharged from incarceration.

The state department of corrections is prepared to transmit to the secretary of state the information specified in subsection (d) hereof.

Probation and parole officers are informed of the change in the law and are prepared to notify probationers and parolees that their right to vote is restored.

Accurate and complete information about the voting rights of people who have been charged with or convicted of crimes, whether disfranchising or not, is made available through a single publication to government officials and the public.

Voting rights shall be restored to all Rhode Island residents who have been discharged from incarceration or who were never incarcerated following felony convictions, whether they were discharged or sentenced before or after the effective date of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 476, § 1.